Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.130

Commodity commission—Meetings—Quorum—Compensation—Travel expenses for members and employees.

Each commodity commission shall hold such regular meetings as the marketing order may prescribe or that the commission by resolution may prescribe, together with such special meetings that may be called in accordance with provisions of its resolutions upon reasonable notice to all members thereof. A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business of the commission.

Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230. Members and employees of the commission may be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, as defined under the commodity commission's marketing order. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced in the marketing order, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2002 c 313 s 56; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 2; 1984 c 287 s 17; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 20; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 10; 1972 ex.s. c 112 s 3; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.130. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.